Be It Enacted by the People of the State of Oregon:
SECTION 1.
In addition to and not in lieu of any other appropriation,  there is appropri-
ated to the Employment Department, for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, out of  the
General Fund,  the amount of $5,767,819, for administrative expenses related to unemploy-
ment insurance and shared services.
SECTION 2. Notwithstanding any other law limiting expenditures, the limitation on ex-
penditures established by section 4, chapter ___, Oregon  Laws 2023 (Enrolled Senate Bill
5507), for the biennium beginning July 1, 2023, as the maximum limit for payment of expenses
from federal funds, other than those  described in section 2, chapter ___, Oregon Laws 2023
(Enrolled Senate Bill 5507), collected or received by the Employment Department, is de-
creased by $2,097,000.
SECTION 3.
This 2023 Act being necessary for the immediate preservation of the public
peace, health and safety, an emergency  is declared to exist, and this 2023 Act takes effect
July 1, 2023.
Enrolled House Bill 5049 (HB 5049-A) Page 1
Passed by House June 24, 2023
..................................................................................
Timothy G. Sekerak, Chief Clerk of House
..................................................................................
Dan Rayfield, Speaker of House
Passed by Senate June 25, 2023
..................................................................................
Rob Wagner, President of Senate
Received by Governor:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
Approved:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Tina Kotek, Governor
Filed in Office of Secretary of State:
........................M.,........................................................., 2023
..................................................................................
Secretary of State
Enrolled House Bill 5049 (HB 5049-A) Page 2